Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-301
County resurvey; petition; contents; election.

Upon petition filed with the county clerk of any county, signed by twenty percent of the qualified voters of said county as shown by the last preceding election and praying the county board to submit the proposition of ordering a resurvey, in whole or in part, of said county for the purpose of reestablishing the original corners of the United States survey, it shall be the duty of the county board to submit to the voters of the county at the next general election, or a special election, the question whether such resurvey shall be ordered; Provided, upon a like petition signed by twenty percent of the voters of any township or townships in said county, according to the government survey thereof, praying for the submission of a like proposition to the voters of said township or townships, it shall be the duty of the county board in like manner to submit the question at the next general election, or a special election, whether a resurvey shall be ordered in said township or townships. In every case the petition shall set forth in brief form the extent of the resurvey desired and whether it shall be of the township and county lines, or of the county, township and sectional lines, and an estimate as near as may be by the county surveyor of the probable expense of said resurvey. This statement and estimate shall be placed upon the official ballot with the following words thereafter: For resurvey proposition, and Against resurvey proposition.

Laws 1909, c. 36, § 1, p. 219;

Laws 1913, c. 153, § 1, p. 392;

R.S.1913, § 1108;

C.S.1922, § 1042;

C.S.1929, § 26-736;

R.S.1943, § 23-301.